Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
81-15,165
Tax Commissioner;
collection fee; Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fees Collection Fund;
created; investment.

The Tax Commissioner shall
deduct and withhold from the fees collected pursuant to sections 81-15,159
to 81-15,165 a fee sufficient to reimburse himself or herself for the actual
cost of collecting and administering such fees and shall credit such collection
fee to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fees Collection Fund which
is hereby created. The Legislature shall appropriate money from the fund to
the Department of Revenue to cover the actual costs of the department in administering
the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fees Collection
Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1990, LB 163, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 123;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 79.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.